trunk/apertium-eu-es/apertium-eu-es.eu-es-adjgender.dix
    <pardef n="AQ_ADB_ADOARR">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0CN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0CP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0CS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0FN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0FP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0FPP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0FS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0FSP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0MN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0MP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0MPP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0MS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQ0MSP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDCN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDCP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDCS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDFN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDFP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDFPP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDFS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDFSP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDMN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDMP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDMPP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDMS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQDMSP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>txo[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQACN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQACP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQACS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQAFN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQAFP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQAFPP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQAFS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQAFSP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQAMN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQAMP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQAMPP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQAMS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQAMSP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]<s n="suf"/>tzar[ATZ][IZE][ARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXCN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXCP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXCS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXFN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXFP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXFPP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXFS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXFSP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXMN0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXMP0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXMPP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMP]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXMS0</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>AQXMSP</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]<s n="mi"/>[NUMS]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l><s n="parol"/>noKAT</l> 
        <r><s n="pos"/>[ADB][ADOARR]</r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

    <e>
      <p>
        <l>esna</l> 
        <r>despierto</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="AQ_ADB_ADOARR"/> 
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>hiltzeraino</l> 
        <r>a_muerte</r> 
      </p>
        <par n="AQ_ADB_ADOARR"/> 
    </e>
